src/phon-sma.xfst
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@hum.uit.no or divvun@samediggi.no

! ===================================== !
! Phonological converter for South Sámi !
! ===================================== !

! To eventual curious readers
! This file tries out conversion from Sámi orthography to a phonetic
! translation based upon IPA. There is a switch at the end to get 
! different formats: SAMPA, Fenno-Ugric transcription or Finnish
! orthography.

! Usage: Compile sme as usual:
! make GTLANG=sma
! Pipe text through the analyser:
! cat text | preprocess | lookup -flags mbTT bin/phon-sma.fst | ..


! We might also add syllable boundaries. Here the simple version:
!cat text | preprocess | lookup -flags mbTT -utf8 bin/hyphrules-sma.fst | cut -f2 | lookup -flags mbTT -utf8 bin/phon-sma.fst | cut -f2 | tr '\n' ' '  | see

! echo "dïhte lea 123" | preprocess | 
! lookup -flags mbTT -utf8 bin/sma-num.fst | cut -f2 |
! lookup -flags mbTT -utf8 bin/hyphrules-sma.fst | cut -f2 | 
! lookup -flags mbTT -utf8 bin/phon-sma.fst | cut -f2 | tr '\n' ' ' | l


echo <<defining Cns and Vow...>>


echo <<defining Cns and Vow...>>



define Vow       [ a | á | e | i | o | u | y | æ | ø | å | ä | ö | 
                   A | Á | E | I | O | U | Y | Æ | Ø | Å | Ä | Ö | 
                   é | ó | ú | í | à | è | ò | ù | ì | ë | ü | ï | 
                   â | ê | ô | û | î | ã | ý |
                   É | Ó | Ú | Í | À | È | Ò | Ù | Ì | Ë | Ü | Ï | 
                   Â | Ê | Ô | Û | Î | Ã | Ý ] ;

define Cns [ b | c | č | d | đ | f | g | h | j | k | l | m | n | ŋ | 
             B | C | Č | D | Đ | F | G | H | J | K | L | M | N | Ŋ | 
             p | q | r | s | š | t | ŧ | v | w | x | z | ž |   
             P | Q | R | S | Š | T | Ŧ | V | W | X | Z | Ž | ɟ | ʎ ] ; 

define Sgm [ Vow | Cns ] ;

define Stop [ p | t | k | c | č ] ;

define Alv [ t | T | d | D | ŧ | Ŧ | đ | Đ | s | S | l | L | r | R | n | N ] ;

define Son [ m | n | ŋ | l | r | j | v | đ ] ;

define Nas [ m | M | n | N | ŋ | Ŋ ] ;

define Dummy %^SL ;

define Syll Cns* Vow+ Cns* (Dummy) Cns* (ə)  ;
! define Syll Cns* Vow+ Cns* (Dummy) Cns* (ə) %^ ;


! SecondaryLenghtening

echo << Rules>>

define down [ A -> a, Á -> á, B -> b, C -> c, Č -> č, D -> d, E -> e, F -> f, 
              G -> g, H -> h, I -> i, J -> j, K -> k, L -> l, M -> m, N -> n, 
              Ŋ -> ŋ, O -> o, P -> p, Q -> q, R -> r, S -> s, Š -> š, T -> t, 
              U -> u, V -> v, W -> w, X -> x, Y -> y, Z -> z, Ž -> ž, Æ -> æ, 
              Ø -> ø, Å -> å, Ö -> ö, Ä -> ä  ] ;




echo << Rules >>


! Here comes the other rules

define InitialAspiration p -> p ʰ , t -> t ʰ , k -> k ʰ || .#. _ Vow ;


define Geminates b p -> p p , d t -> t t , g k -> k k , g n -> ŋ ŋ ;

define eApocope e -> 0 || Syll [o|i] _ [.#.| m i n i e ] ; ! berkoe > berko

define uRule u -> ʉ ;

define uvLengthening o v -> u u v ;

define oeRule o -> ʉ ,  a -> æ || _ e Sgm ;

define Diphthong a -> æ || e _ ;

define ijRule j -> i || i _ [\j] ,,
              v -> ʉ || ʉ _ [\v] ,,
              j -> y || y _ [\j] ;

define slRule s -> š || [.#.|%#|%-] _ l ;

define snjRule s -> š || [.#.|%#|%-] _ n j ;


define oRule o -> u ;


define SyllShortening b b -> b , d d -> d , f f -> f , g g -> g , j j -> j , 
	                  k k -> k , l l -> l , m m -> m , n n -> n , p p -> p ,
	                  r r -> r , s s -> s , t t -> t , v v -> v || Vow Vow _ ;

! Late rules

define åASo å -> o ;

define schwa e -> ə || Syll Cns _  ;

define Affricats t j -> c , s j -> š ; 




echo << And now we go for some OUTPUTFORMAT or another >>

! The rules above are somewhat oriented towards the orthography, and rearrange
! based upon that. Now, we might want to have output in different formats for 
! different reasons:
! SAMPA   = for the Helsinki tts engine
! IPA     = so that we may read it during development
! FINNISH = to target the fallback Bitlips demo if we are not able to meet the
!           October deadline with the generated Sámi voice.

!The idea is to comment out two of the following three rules and keep the one intended.


! ... here outputformat is SAMPA:              
!define OUTPUTFORMAT ə -> %@ , ä -> %{ , æ -> %{ , ö -> 2 , ø -> 2 , a -> A , 
!                   n j -> J , ŋ -> N , š -> S , đ -> D ,  ŧ -> T , ɟ -> J \ , 
!              L -> l %_ %0 , R -> r %_ %0 , M -> m %_ %0 , N -> n %_ %0 , 
!              Ŋ -> N %_ %0 , V -> v %_ %0 ,
!               %^ -> %. ;
! note potential problems with J\.

! ... here outputformat is IPA:              
 define OUTPUTFORMAT a -> ɑ , ä -> æ , ö -> ø , n j -> ɲ , š -> ʃ , đ -> ð , ŧ -> θ , w -> β , W -> ɸ ,
                     L -> l̥ , R -> r̥ , M -> m̥ , N   -> n̥ , Ŋ -> ŋ̊ , V -> v̥ , J -> ç , 
                     %^ -> %. ;
define OUTPUTFORMAT2   h -> ʰ || [.#.|%-] [p|t|k] _ Vow ; ! for rules with context...



! ... here outputformat is FUPA:
! define OUTPUTFORMAT a -> ɑ , n j -> ń , đ -> ð ,
!                                          
!                     %^ -> %. ;



define COLONLENGTH   ɑ ɑ -> ɑ ː , e e -> e ː , i i -> i ː , o o -> o ː , u u -> u ː ,
                     ø ø -> ø ː , æ æ -> æ ː , 
                     b b -> b ː , β β -> β ː , ɸ ɸ -> ɸ ː , ɟ ɟ -> ɟ ː , c c -> c ː , 
                     d d -> d ː , ð ð -> ð ː , f f -> f ː , g g -> g ː , 
                     h h -> h ː , j j -> j ː , k k -> k ː , l l -> l ː , ʎ ʎ -> ʎ ː ,
                     m m -> m ː , n n -> n ː , ɲ ɲ -> ɲ ː , p p -> p ː , r r -> r ː , 
                     s s -> s ː , t t -> t ː , ʃ ʃ -> ʃ ː , v v -> v ː ,
                     l̥ l̥  -> l̥ ː , r̥ r̥  -> r̥ ː , m̥ m̥ -> m̥ ː , n̥ n̥ -> n̥ ː , ŋ ŋ -> ŋ ː , 
                     ŋ̊ ŋ̊ -> ŋ̊ ː , v̥ v̥ -> v̥ ː ;


! ... here outputformat is Finnish orthography:              
! define OUTPUTFORMAT ŋ -> n g , ŧ -> s , đ -> r , š -> s ,
!                       %^ -> %.  ;
! This rule is incomplete!

! Cleaning up

define DummyDeletion Dummy -> 0 ;


echo <<Combining...>>

read regex [ 
!    POSTAG .o. 
    down 
.o. InitialAspiration    
.o. Geminates    
.o. eApocope
.o. uRule
.o. uvLengthening
.o. oeRule
.o. Diphthong
.o. ijRule
.o. slRule
.o. snjRule
.o. oRule
.o. SyllShortening
.o. åASo
.o. schwa
.o. Affricats
.o. OUTPUTFORMAT
.o. OUTPUTFORMAT2
.o. COLONLENGTH
.o. DummyDeletion

] ;


invert net ;


!  For reference: The SAMPA - IPA correspondence

!  SAMPA   IPA  Description
!  p       p    voiceless bilabial stop
!  b       b    voiced bilabial stop
!  t       t    voiceless alveolar or dental stop
!  d       d    voiced alveolar or dental stop
!  ts      ʦ    voiceless alveolar affricate
!  dz      ʣ    voiced alveolar affricate
!  tS      ʧ    voiceless postalveolar affricate
!  dZ      ʤ    voiced postalveolar affricate
!  c       c    voiceless palatal stop
!  J\      ɟ    (overstroked j)    voiced palatal stop
!  k       k    voiceless velar stop
!  g       g    voiced velar stop
!  q       q    voiceless uvular stop
!  p\      ɸ    (Greek phi)    voiceless bilabial fricative
!  B       β    (Greek beta)    voiced bilabial fricative
!          ϐ    (Greek beta alt)    voiced bilabial approximant
!  f       f    voiceless labiodental fricative
!  v       v    voiced labiodental fricative
!  T       θ    (Greek theta)    voiceless dental fricative
!          ϑ    (Greek theta alt)    voiceless dental approximant
!  D       ð    (Icelandic eth)    voiced dental fricative
!          δ    (Greek delta)    voiced dental approximant
!  s       s    voiceless alveolar fricative
!  z       z    voiced alveolar fricative
!  S       ʃ    voiceless postalveolar fricative
!  Z       ʒ    voiced postalveolar fricative
!  C       ç    (cedilla)    voiceless palatal fricative
!  j\ (jj) ʝ    (j with crossed tail)    voiced palatal fricative
!  x       x    voiceless velar fricative
!  G       γ    (Greek gamma)    voiced velar fricative
!          ɰ    voiced velar approximant
!  X\      ħ    (overstroked h)    voiceless pharyngeal fricative
!  ?\      ʕ    (Inverted ?)    voiced pharyngeal fricative
!  h       h    voiceless glottal approximant
!  h\      ɦ    (h with upper tail to the right)    voiced glottal approximant
!  m       m    bilabial nasal
!  F       ɱ    (m with downward right tail)    labiodental nasal
!  n       n    alveolar or dental nasal
!  J       ɲ    (n with downward left tail)    palatal nasal
!  N       ŋ    (n with downward right tail)    velar nasal
!  l       l    alveolar lateral
!  L       ʎ    turned down y, alt. λ (Greek lambda)    palatal lateral
!  5       ɫ    (l with middle tilde)    velarized dental lateral
!  4 (r)   ɾ    (r without upper-left serif)    alveolar flap
!  r (rr)  r    alveolar trill
!  r\      ɹ    (r rotated 180°)    retroflexed alveolar approximant
!  R       ʀ    (small capital R)    uvular trill
!  P       ʋ    labiodental approximant
!  w       w    velo-labial approximant
!  H       ɥ    (turned down h)    palato-labial approximant
!  j       j    palatal approximant
!  
!  Vowels
!                front   near-front    central   near-back   back
!  close          i • y               1 • }                 M • u
!  near-close              I • Y                    U
!  close-mid      e • 2              @\ • 8                 7 • o
!  mid                                  @            
!  open-mid       E • 9               3 • 3\                V • O
!  near-open        {                    6           
!  open           a • &                                     A • Q



! More documentation
